Connecticut, session 2026, SB00293.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to any cause
of action arising from an incident committed on or after said date) (a) As used
in this section:
(1) "Fraud in the provision of fertility care and treatment" means
knowingly performing assistive reproductive treatment while using
human reproductive material from any individual, including the health
care provider's own reproductive material, other than the use of human
reproductive material that the patient specifically consented to using in
writing;
(2) "Assisted reproductive treatment" includes intrauterine or
intracervical insemination; in vitro fertilization and embryo transfer;
donation of eggs, sperm or embryos; or related clinical procedures
designed to cause pregnancy other than sexual intercourse;
(3) "Human reproductive material" means human spermatozoon or
ovum or a human organism at any state of development from fertilized
ovum to embryo; and
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 293
(4) "Health care provider" means any person licensed under the laws
of this state to provide health care, or any other individual who handles
human reproductive material in a health care setting.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 52-577 of the general
statutes, an action to recover damages for personal injury caused by
fraud in the provision of fertility care and treatment may be brought not
later than thirty years from the date on which the minor child affected
by fraud in the provision of fertility care attains the age of twenty-one.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and New section
applicable to any cause of
action arising from an
incident committed on or
after said date
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2